Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 9
TRUST PRACTICES

11-109-901. Reserves against deposits.

Trust companies that are subject to reserve provisions of the "Federal Reserve Act" shall maintain such reserves against deposits as may be required by the "Federal Reserve Act", but, in addition thereto, the banking board may by rule impose reserve requirements that it deems prudent and sound on trust companies, including trust companies not subject to reserve provisions of the "Federal Reserve Act". In promulgating these rules, the banking board shall consider all relevant factors, including without limitation, the factors set forth in section 11-101-102.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1203, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-109.5 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the "Federal Reserve Act", see 12 U.S.C. § 221 et seq.

11-109-902. Investments.

In addition to other investments expressly authorized by this article or the rules promulgated by the banking board, a trust company may purchase:

Obligations that satisfy the requirements of this article or the rules promulgated by the banking board for loans for state banks;

Obligations of, or fully guaranteed by, the United States, a state of the United States, or the Dominion of Canada;

Obligations of the international bank for reconstruction and redevelopment;

Farm loan bonds issued by any federal land bank organized pursuant to an act of congress approved July 17, 1916, entitled: "An Act to provide capital for agricultural development, to create standard forms of investment based upon farm mortgages, to furnish a market for United States bonds, to create government depositories and financial agents for the United States, and for other purposes." and known as the "Federal Farm Loan Act", and acts amendatory thereto. Such farm loan bonds shall be accepted as security for all public deposits and in all cases where bonds are required by law to be deposited with any department or public official of this state, but this section shall not be so construed as to prohibit such moneys or deposits from being invested in such other securities provided for by law.

General obligations of a territory of the United States, a province of the Dominion of Canada, or a political subdivision or instrumentality of a state or territory of the United States;

Obligations of a corporation chartered by the United States or a state thereof doing business in the United States; or an authority organized under state law, an interstate compact, or by substantially identical legislation adopted by two or more states if any of the foregoing under this paragraph (f) are approved by the banking board for investment;

Revenue obligations issued to provide, enlarge, or improve electric power, gas, water and sewer facilities by any city or town having a population of not less than two thousand people at the time of the investment, located in any state in the United States or territories thereof;

Such other obligations as the general assembly has designated or may from time to time designate as legal investments for public funds;

The capital stock of other corporations, including the stock of a corporation regulated under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", as amended, 15 U.S.C. section 80a-1 et seq., and the land or lands and building or buildings in which the business of the trust company is carried on, including its trust company offices, other property in the same building to rent as a source of income, and fixtures, and furniture, safe deposit vaults and boxes, and other personal property such as may be appropriate to carry on its business.

A trust company may, to the extent that banks subject to the laws of the federal government are permitted so to do and to the extent permitted by the rules of the banking board, purchase shares of stock in small business investment companies organized under Public Law No. 85-699, 85th Congress, known as the "Small Business Investment Act of 1958", as amended, but in no event shall any trust company hold shares in small business investment companies in an amount aggregating more than three percent of the trust company's capital and surplus.

No limitation or prohibition otherwise imposed by any provision of state law relating to trust companies shall prevent a trust company from investing not more than ten percent of the trust company's capital as defined in the rules promulgated by the banking board in a bank service corporation as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1861 to 1865, inclusive, and as amended, subject to the rights, powers, and limitations contained therein, and such investment by trust companies is expressly authorized to the extent permitted by the rules of the banking board.

A trust company may acquire or retain an equity investment in a subsidiary of which the trust company is the majority owner, so long as the subsidiary is engaged in activities that are allowed pursuant to this article.

Notwithstanding any restrictions upon investments in obligations, powers, or activities contained in this article, a trust company may invest in any obligation, exercise such powers, and engage in such activities that such trust company could legally acquire, exercise, and engage in were it operating as a national bank at the time such investment was made, such powers were exercised, or such activities were engaged in, to the extent permitted by the rules promulgated by the banking board.

A trust company may invest an amount not exceeding ten percent of its capital as defined in the rules promulgated by the banking board in the stock of any bank or bank holding company that provides services solely to depository institutions and their shareholders, directors, officers, and employees, wherein the ownership of stock of the bank or bank holding company, except for any stock required by law to be owned by directors of the bank or bank holding company, is restricted to banks, trust companies, or bank holding companies. The amount of stock owned by a trust company in any such bank or bank holding company shall not be in excess of five percent of the voting shares of such bank or bank holding company.

A trust company may directly engage in activities that are primarily investments in real estate or may acquire and hold the voting stock of one or more corporations the activities of which are primarily investments in real estate. Such activities may include subdividing and developing real property and building residential housing or commercial improvements on such property and may also include owning, renting, leasing, managing, operating for income, or selling such property. Such property shall be entered on the books at not more than cost or fair market value, whichever is less. The total of all investments made by a trust company pursuant to the authority of this subsection (7) shall not exceed ten percent of its capital.

Upon finding that such restrictions are necessary according to the criteria set forth in section 11-101-102, the banking board may adopt rules that restrict the total investments of a trust company under this subsection (7) to a percentage less than ten percent of the trust company's capital. Nothing in this subsection (7) shall authorize a trust company to contravene a lawful order of the banking board or commissioner with respect to investments by the trust company in real estate or corporations engaging in real estate activities. A trust company that intends to initiate a program of investments under the authority of this subsection (7) shall give sixty days' advance notice to the division of banking of such intent; except that such notice may be waived in the banking board's discretion where such notice is impracticable or unnecessary. The trust company shall also notify the division within ten days after the commencement of the investment program. If similar notices are required by the trust company's federal supervisory agency, the same form of notice may be used for purposes of notice under this subsection (7).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1203, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-110 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

The "Federal Farm Loan Act", referenced in this section, was repealed in 1971 by the "Farm Credit Act of 1971", which also provided that references to the "Farm Loan Act" shall be deemed to refer to the comparable provisions of the "Farm Credit Act of 1971", Pub.L. 92-181, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.

11-109-903. Substitution of trust companies.

Trust companies created under this article may participate in the transfer of trust assets in the case of a substitution of one fiduciary for another under the provisions of sections 11-101-401, 11-106-105, and 11-106-106.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1205, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-110.5 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-904. Laws governing individuals apply.

A trust company in the exercise of its fiduciary powers shall be subject to the same duties, liabilities, and penalties as an individual fiduciary acting in like capacity.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1205, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-111 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-905. Separation of fiduciary funds.

A trust company shall keep fiduciary funds and investments separate and apart from its own assets. All investments made as a fiduciary shall be so designated so that fiduciary funds may be clearly identified.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1205, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-112 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-906. Funds awaiting investment or distribution.

Funds held by a trust company in a fiduciary capacity that are awaiting investment or distribution shall not be held uninvested or undistributed any longer than is reasonable for the proper management of the account. Funds held in trust by a trust company awaiting investment or distribution may, unless prohibited by the instrument creating the trust, be deposited in an account with the trust company as provided in section 11-109-201 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1205, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-113 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-907. Extensions of credit.

A trust company shall not make any loans or extensions of credit except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

A trust company may:

Make a loan or extend credit to its officers, directors, and employees if such loan or credit is adequately secured and does not involve more than the normal risk of default or present other unfavorable features. Any loan or extension of credit in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars shall be subject to prior approval by the banking board.

Establish with one or more broker-dealers margin accounts in its name as fiduciary or custodian for the benefit of the owners or beneficiaries of such accounts.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1206, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1502, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2013:

(1) and IP(2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1485, § 58, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-114 as it existed prior to 2003.